Maine, session 132, LD1546.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA §170-C is enacted to read:
§170-C. Reports of study commissions to Legislature
When a study commission is authorized to provide to the Legislature a report that
includes that study commission's recommendations, those recommendations must be
produced as an Act or resolve and are authorized for submission to the Legislature to which
the study commission is authorized to submit its report. All such legislation must be
referred to a committee of that Legislature and given a public hearing.
As used in this section, "study commission" means any group of individuals established
in an Act, resolve or joint order or by the Legislative Council whose duties include studying
and reporting to the Legislature on any matter or advising the Legislature on any matter.
As used in this section, "committee" means a joint standing committee or joint select
committee of the Legislature.